test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-keqzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - keʼž: # Noun 87 'eng /est käsi/fin' - full paradigm
     keʼž+N+Sg+Nom: keʼž
     keʼž+N+Sg+Gen: käʼd
     keʼž+N+Sg+Par: kätā
     keʼž+N+Sg+Dat: käʼddõn
     keʼž+N+Sg+Ins: käʼdkõks
     keʼž+N+Sg+Ill: käʼddõ
     keʼž+N+Sg+Ela: käʼdstõ
     keʼž+N+Pl+Nom: kädūd
     keʼž+N+Pl+Gen: kädūd
     keʼž+N+Pl+Par: keʼžži
     keʼž+N+Pl+Dat: kädūdõn
     keʼž+N+Pl+Ins: kädūdõks
     keʼž+N+Pl+Ill: kežīz
     keʼž+N+Pl+Ela: kežīst
